zh-CN: 织物修复套件的预期用途: 磨损修补; 卷边; 破洞; 户外装备修补; 加固（膝盖/手肘）; 缝线修补; 撕裂/裂口; 室内装饰材料修补; 其他
el: Κιτ επισκευής υφασμάτων για προβλεπόμενη χρήση: Επισκευή από τριβή/φθορά; Στρίφωμα; Τρύπες; Επισκευή εξοπλισμού εξωτερικού χώρου; Ενίσχυση (γόνατα/αγκώνες); Επισκευή ραφής; Σκισίματα/φθορές; Επισκευή ταπετσαρίας; Άλλο
th: วัตถุประสงค์การใช้งานของชุดซ่อมแซมผ้า: ซ่อมแซมรอยถลอก/รอยสึกหรอ; การเย็บชาย; รูขาด; ซ่อมแซมอุปกรณ์กลางแจ้ง; การเสริมความแข็งแรง (เข่า/ข้อศอก); ซ่อมแซมตะเข็บ; รอยฉีกขาด; ซ่อมแซมวัสดุบุเฟอร์นิเจอร์; อื่นๆ
fr: Usage prévu du kit de réparation pour tissu: Réparation d’abrasion/usure; Ourlet; Trous; Réparation d’équipement de plein air; Renforcement (genoux/coudes); Réparation de coutures; Déchirures/accrocs; Réparation de tissus d’ameublement; Autre
hu: A szövetjavító készlet rendeltetésszerű használata: Kopás/elhasználódás javítása; Szegés; Lyukak; Kültéri felszerelés javítása; Megerősítés (térd/könyök); Varrat javítása; Szakadások/hasadások; Kárpitjavítás; Egyéb
lt-LT: Audinio taisymo rinkinio paskirtis: Nusidėvėjimo / įplyšimų taisymas; Atlenkimas; Skylės; Lauko įrangos taisymas; Sutvirtinimas (keliai / alkūnės); Siūlių taisymas; Įplyšimai / plyšiai; Apmušalų taisymas; Kitas
zh-TW: 布料修補套件預期用途: 磨損/耗損修補; 縫邊; 破洞; 戶外裝備修補; 加固 (膝蓋/手肘); 接縫修補; 撕裂/裂縫; 室內裝飾修補; 其他
ro-RO: Utilizarea prevăzută a kitului de reparație a țesăturilor: Reparare abraziuni/uzură; Tivire; Găuri; Reparare echipament de exterior; Întărire (genunchi/coate); Reparare cusături; Rupturi/sfâșieri; Reparare tapițerie; Altele
pt-PT: kit de reparação de tecidos - uso pretendido: Reparação de abrasão/desgaste; Bainhas; Buracos; Reparação de equipamento de exterior; Reforço (joelhos/cotovelos); Reparação de costuras; Rasgões/ruturas; Reparação de estofos; Outro
ja: 布地補修キットの用途: 擦れ/摩耗の補修; 裾上げ; 穴あき; アウトドア用品の補修; 補強 (膝/肘); 縫い目の補修; 破れ/裂け; 室内装飾品の補修; その他
sl-SI: Popravilo tkanin komplet, predvidena uporaba: Popravilo obrabe; Robljenje; Luknje; Popravilo opreme za na prosto; Ojačitev (kolena/komolci); Popravilo šivov; Raztrganine; Popravilo oblazinjenja; Drugo
nb: Tiltenkt bruk av stoffreparasjonssett: Reparasjon av slitasje; Opplegging; Hull; Reparasjon av utendørsutstyr; Forsterkning (knær/albuer); Reparasjon av søm; Rifter/revner; Reparasjon av møbeltrekk; Annet
it: kit di riparazione tessuti - Uso previsto: Riparazione abrasioni/usura; Orlatura; Fori; Riparazione attrezzature da esterni; Rinforzo (ginocchia/gomiti); Riparazione cuciture; Strappi/scuciture; Riparazione tappezzeria; Altro
sk-SK: Účel použitia súpravy na opravu tkanín: Oprava odrenín/opotrebenia; Lemovanie; Diery; Oprava outdoorového výstroja; Vystuženie (kolená/lakte); Oprava švov; Trhliny/roztrhnutia; Oprava čalúnenia; Iný
nl: Stofreparatieset beoogd gebruik: Slijtage-/schadereparatie; Zomen; Gaten; Reparatie van outdooruitrusting; Versterking (knieën/ellebogen); Naadreparatie; Scheuren; Bekledingsreparatie; Overig
de: Vorgesehene Verwendung des Stoffreparaturkits: Reparatur von Abrieb/Verschleiß; Säumen; Löcher; Reparatur von Outdoor-Ausrüstung; Verstärkung (Knie/Ellenbogen); Nahtreparatur; Risse/Einrisse; Polsterreparatur; Sonstiges
ko: 패브릭 수선 키트 용도: 마모/해짐 수선; 단 처리; 구멍; 아웃도어 장비 수선; 보강(무릎/팔꿈치); 솔기 수선; 찢어짐; 실내 장식 수선; 기타
sv: Avsedd användning för tygreparationskit: Reparation av nötning/slitage; Fållning; Hål; Reparation av friluftsutrustning; Förstärkning (knän/armbågar); Sömreparation; Revor/sprickor; Reparation av möbelklädsel; Övrigt
da: Tilsigtet anvendelse af tekstilreparationssæt: Slidreparation; Oplægning; Huller; Reparation af udendørsudstyr; Forstærkning (knæ/albuer); Sømreparation; Flænger/rifter; Møbelreparation; Andet
hr-HR: Popravak tkanine - kompletna namjena: Popravak ogrebotina / istrošenosti; Porubljivanje; Rupe; Popravak opreme za aktivnosti na otvorenom; Ojačanje (koljena/laktovi); Popravak šavova; Poderotine/razderotine; Popravak tapecirunga; Ostalo
bg-BG: Предназначение на комплекта за ремонт на тъкани: Ремонт на протриване/износване; Подгъване; Дупки; Ремонт на екипировка за открито; Подсилване (колене/лакти); Ремонт на шевове; Скъсвания/разкъсвания; Ремонт на тапицерия; Друго
cs: Účel použití opravné sady na tkaniny: Oprava oděrek/opotřebení; Lemování; Díry; Oprava outdoorového vybavení; Zesílení (kolena/lokty); Oprava švů; Trhliny/roztržení; Oprava čalounění; Jiné
ru: Назначение набора для ремонта ткани: Ремонт потертостей/износа; Подшивка; Дыры; Ремонт туристического снаряжения; Укрепление (коленей/локтей); Ремонт швов; Разрывы; Ремонт обивки; Другое
en: Fabric repair kit intended use: Abrasion/wear repair; Hemming; Holes; Outdoor gear repair; Reinforcement (knees/elbows); Seam repair; Tears/rips; Upholstery repair; Other
fi: Kankaan korjaussarjan käyttötarkoitus: Hankautuman/kulumisen korjaus; Päärmäys; Reiät; Ulkoiluvarusteiden korjaus; Vahvistus (polvet/kyynärpäät); Sauman korjaus; Repeämät; Verhoilun korjaus; Muu
es: Uso previsto del kit de reparación de telas: Reparación de abrasión/desgaste; Dobladillos; Agujeros; Reparación de equipos para exteriores; Refuerzo (rodillas/codos); Reparación de costuras; Desgarros/roturas; Reparación de tapicería; Otro
vi: Mục đích sử dụng của bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa vải: Sửa chữa vết mài mòn/rách; Khâu viền; Lỗ thủng; Sửa chữa thiết bị ngoài trời; Gia cố (đầu gối/khuỷu tay); Sửa đường may; Vết rách/rách toạc; Sửa chữa bọc ghế; Khác
pt-BR: Uso pretendido do kit de reparo de tecido: Reparo de abrasão/desgaste; Bainha; Furos; Reparo de equipamentos para uso ao ar livre; Reforço (joelhos/cotovelos); Reparo de costura; Rasgos; Reparo de estofado; Outros
pl: Zestaw do naprawy tkanin przeznaczony do użytku: Naprawa przetarć / zużycia; Podszywanie; Dziury; Naprawa sprzętu outdoorowego; Wzmocnienie (kolana / łokcie); Naprawa szwów; Rozdarcia; Naprawa tapicerki; Inne
tr: Kumaş tamir kit kullanım amacı: Aşınma/yıpranma onarımı; Baskı/kıvırma; Delikler; Dış mekan ekipmanı onarımı; Güçlendirme (dizler/dirsekler); Dikiş onarımı; Yırtıklar; Döşeme onarımı; Diğer